Connecticut, session 2026, SB00127.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the following additional sums be appropriated from the General
Fund, for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027: (1) Ninety-one million
dollars to The University of Connecticut; (2) seventy-six million dollars
to the Board of Regents for Higher Education; and (3) seventy-two
million dollars for Connecticut State Colleges and Universities and
Connecticut State Community Colleges.